Hawaii statutes.
[§266-2.5] Outdoor lighting. To
the extent that it is practical and not in conflict with any safety regulation
or federal law, regulation, or mandate, if any harbor rule or standard relating
to outdoor lighting at any harbor facility conflicts with any county ordinance
or other rule regarding outdoor lighting, the more stringent requirement or
standard shall govern all new installations of outdoor lighting. [L 2007, c
121, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next